Idaho, session 2025, S1091.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-5605, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-5605. EDUCATION OPPORTUNITY RESOURCE ACT -- RULEMAKING. (1) The
state department board of education shall distribute appropriated moneys
to districts for reimbursement for the cost of internet service and other
allowable services in accordance with the methodology established by the
education opportunity resource committee.
(2) The commission for libraries shall distribute appropriated moneys
to Idaho public libraries for reimbursement for the cost of internet service
and other allowable services in accordance with the methodology established
by the education opportunity resource committee and shall provide techni-
cal, E-rate, and security contracting, procurement guidance, and assistance
to Idaho public libraries at any such entity's request.
(3) The state board of education may:
(a) Promulgate rules in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho
Code, to implement the provisions of this chapter. In promulgating
such rules, the board shall collaborate with the education opportunity
resource committee;
(b) Authorize funding increases for internet service levels when a dis-
trict consistently exceeds utilization benchmarks, as established by
the education opportunity resource committee, during school or busi-
ness days and hours, provided adequate funding is available; and
(c) Provide technical, E-rate, and security contracting, procurement
guidance, and assistance to districts at any such entity's request.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.